Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.55.020

"Executive state officer" defined. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

For the purposes of RCW 29B.55.010, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, the secretary of children, youth, and families, the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of Washington technology solutions, the secretary of corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, state liquor and cannabis board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

[ 2024 c 164 s 487; 2024 c 54 s 40; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 111. Prior: 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 406; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 317; 2012 c 229 s 582; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 109; 2010 c 204 s 902; 2009 c 565 s 24; prior: 2007 c 341 s 48; 2007 c 241 s 2; 2007 c 15 s 1; 2006 c 265 s 113; 2005 c 424 s 17; prior: 2001 c 36 s 1; 2001 c 9 s 1; 1996 c 186 s 504; prior: 1995 c 399 s 60; 1995 c 397 s 10; prior: 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 18; 1993 c 492 s 488; 1993 c 281 s 43; 1991 c 200 s 404; 1991 c 3 s 293; prior: 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 812; 1989 c 279 s 22; 1989 c 158 s 2; 1988 c 36 s 13; 1987 c 504 s 14; 1985 c 6 s 8; 1984 c 34 s 2. Formerly RCW 42.17A.705, 42.17.2401.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 54 s 40 and by 2024 c 164 s 487, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 109: "Section 109 of this act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 111.]

Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See note following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Alphabetization—2010 c 204 s 902: "When RCW 42.17A.705 is codified, the code reviser shall arrange the names of the agencies in each subsection in alphabetical order, arranged according to the first distinctive word of each agency's name." [ 2010 c 204 s 1101.]

Effective date—2007 c 341: See RCW 90.71.907.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 241: See notes following RCW 79A.25.005.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 186: See notes following RCW 43.330.904.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 2 ss 1-6, 8-59, and 61-79: See RCW 43.300.900.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Effective dates—1991 c 200: See RCW 90.56.901.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Alphabetization—1989 c 158 s 2: "When section 2 of this act is codified, the code reviser shall arrange the names of the agencies in each subsection in alphabetical order." [ 1989 c 158 s 3.] The names of the agencies in the above section have been arranged according to the first distinctive word of each agency's name.